Florida, session 2026, SB1676.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 75 76 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âRaising 77 Achievement by Improving Standards and Earnings (RAISE) Act.â 78 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 79 1007.271, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (c) is 80 added to that subsection, to read: 81 1007.271âDual enrollment programs.â 82 (4)(a)âDistrict school boards and private high schools 83 participating in a scholarship program under s. 1002.394 or s. 84 1002.395 shall enter into dual enrollment articulation 85 agreements and private school articulation agreements, 86 respectively, with the Florida College System institution that 87 serves the school district or private high schoolâs county and 88 with any state universities that have a physical campus in that 89 district or county. Florida College System institutions and 90 state universities shall allow any student who is eligible for 91 dual enrollment under this section, and whose district school 92 board or private high school has entered into such an agreement, 93 to enroll in any intermediate STEM course or advanced STEM 94 course for which the student has accomplished one of the 95 following: 96 1.âCompleted the prerequisite postsecondary courses; 97 2.âPassed the relevant exams for rigorous STEM courses, as 98 specified in s. 1011.62(17)(e), which are equivalent to the 99 prerequisite postsecondary courses; 100 3.âPassed an exam administered by the postsecondary 101 institution to waive the prerequisite postsecondary courses; or 102 4.âSubmitted a written statement from the professor which 103 authorizes the student to take the course may not refuse to 104 enter into a dual enrollment articulation agreement with a local 105 Florida College System institution if that Florida College 106 System institution has the capacity to offer dual enrollment 107 courses. 108 (c)âFor the purposes of this subsection, the term: 109 1.ââAdvanced STEM courseâ means a dual enrollment course 110 for which a prerequisite is the completion of at least one 111 intermediate STEM course or at least one postsecondary course at 112 a level above an intermediate STEM course. If a dual enrollment 113 course meets the definitions of intermediate and advanced, it 114 must be classified as intermediate. 115 2.ââIntermediate STEM courseâ means a dual enrollment 116 course for which a prerequisite is the completion of at least 117 one rigorous STEM course or at least one postsecondary course 118 equivalent to a rigorous STEM course. A dual enrollment course 119 that is equivalent to a rigorous STEM course is not an 120 intermediate STEM course. 121 Section 3.âSubsection (17) of section 1011.62, Florida 122 Statutes, is amended to read: 123 1011.62âFunds for operation of schools.âIf the annual 124 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each 125 district for operation of schools is not determined in the 126 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing 127 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as 128 follows: 129 (17)âADVANCED EDUCATION ACADEMIC ACCELERATION OPTIONS 130 SUPPLEMENT.âThe advanced education options supplement is created 131 and shall be allocated annually in the General Appropriations 132 Act to assist public schools and private schools participating 133 in scholarship programs under s. 1002.394 or s. 1002.395 with 134 providing advanced education options to students in 135 prekindergarten through grade 12, including dual enrollment; 136 College Board Advanced Placement, Advanced International 137 Certificate of Education, and International Baccalaureate 138 programs; CAPE industry certifications; career and technical 139 education; and math and science olympiads. 140 (a)âA student enrolled in a private school who participates 141 in a scholarship program under s. 1002.394 or s. 1002.395 142 generates an advanced education options supplement under this 143 subsection which must be calculated in the same manner as if the 144 student were enrolled in a public school, provided that during 145 the school year in which the student generates the supplement, 146 the studentâs annual tuition, inclusive of the scholarship, plus 147 the mandatory fees for all students in that studentâs grade at 148 the private school, does not exceed 2 times the average amount 149 awarded during that school year under either scholarship program 150 by an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization (SFO). 151 The supplement must be allocated to the SFO that awards the 152 scholarship to the student, and the SFO shall disburse the 153 supplement to the studentâs private school, while retaining up 154 to 1 percent of the total amount of supplement funds for 155 administrative expenses that are reasonable and necessary for 156 the SFOâs management and distribution of the supplement, 157 notwithstanding ss. 1002.394(11)(c) and 1002.395(6)(l). The 158 private school shall expend the supplement in the same manner 159 that a public school is required under this subsection. 160 (b)1.âOn a date set by the department, and in a format 161 prescribed by the department, each school district and each SFO 162 shall report all of the following to the department and to the 163 Legislature: 164 a.âThe value of the supplements received for each advanced 165 education option by students who are enrolled in each public 166 school and each private school, and the school districtâs and 167 the SFOâs total value of such supplements across all 168 participating schools. 169 b.âThe value of the funds disbursed from the supplement for 170 each advanced education option to each public school and each 171 private school, and the school districtâs and SFOâs total value 172 of such funds across all participating schools. 173 c.âThe value and a categorical breakdown of the prior year 174 expenditures for each advanced education option by each public 175 school and each private school using the funds from the 176 supplement, including, but not limited to, exam fees and teacher 177 bonuses for each course, and the prior year total value of such 178 expenditures across all participating schools. 179 2.âOn a date set by the department, and in a format 180 prescribed by the department, each private school shall report 181 all of the following to the respective SFO: 182 a.âThe value of the supplements generated for each advanced 183 education option by students who are enrolled in the private 184 school. 185 b.âThe total value and a categorical breakdown of the prior 186 year expenditures for each advanced education option using the 187 funds disbursed from the supplement, including, but not limited 188 to, exam fees and teacher bonuses for each course. 189 3.âAdvanced education supplements must be allocated to each 190 school district and to each SFO based on the school districtâs 191 proportionate share and the SFOâs proportionate share, 192 respectively, of the stateâs total advanced education values 193 assigned under this subsection. 194 (c)1.âEach value assigned to a student under paragraphs 195 (d), (f), and (g), and under paragraph (e) after applying the 196 relevant multiplier under subparagraph (e)4., and each bonus 197 awarded under sub-subparagraph (f)4.a., must be multiplied by 2 198 if the student meets either of the following requirements: 199 a.âThe student is enrolled in a school located in a county 200 that is a rural community under s. 288.0656(2)(e)1. or 2. 201 b.âThe student is enrolled in a school that is graded a âDâ 202 or âFâ under s. 1008.34. 203 2.âIf sub-subparagraphs 1.a. and b. apply, the value must 204 be multiplied by 4. 205 (d)1.âA value of 0.15 is assigned to a student who receives 206 an associate degree through a dual enrollment program with a 207 grade point average (GPA) of 3.0 or higher on a 4.0 scale, or 208 the value of 0.30 is assigned if the student receives the degree 209 with a GPA of 3.7 or higher on a 4.0 scale. 210 2.âA value is assigned for each grade of âAâ or higher 211 which a student receives in a course under this subparagraph. 212 For the purpose of this paragraph, general education core 213 courses are those that are identified by rule by the State Board 214 of Education and in regulation by the Board of Governors 215 pursuant to s. 1007.25(3). If a student receives a grade of âAâ 216 or higher in the following courses, the corresponding value is 217 assigned as follows: 218 a.âA value of 0.08 is assigned to a student who completes a 219 general education core course, and a value of 0.16 is assigned 220 if the student completes the course through an early college 221 program pursuant to s. 1007.273. 222 b.âA value of 0.08 is assigned to a student who completes a 223 career course through a dual enrollment program in a pathway 224 that leads to an industry certification that is included on the 225 CAPE Industry Certification Funding List. 226 c.âA value of 0.32 is assigned to a student who completes 227 an intermediate STEM course, and a value of 0.64 is assigned to 228 a student who completes an advanced STEM course. 229 3.âEach school district and each SFO shall disburse 100 230 percent of the value of the supplements generated by a student 231 under this paragraph as funds to the dual enrollment program at 232 the secondary school in which the student is enrolled. The 233 schoolâs dual enrollment program shall expend the funds 234 disbursed under this paragraph as follows: 235 a.âAfter applying the relevant multiplier under paragraph 236 (c), at least 50 percent of the value of each supplement 237 generated by a student in a dual enrollment course that is 238 taught by a secondary school teacher must be awarded as a bonus 239 to that teacher. 240 b.âThe remaining balance of funds must be used for expenses 241 associated with dual enrollment courses; however, such funds may 242 not be used to supplant a school districtâs base Florida 243 Education Finance Program funds provided pursuant to paragraph 244 (1)(n). 245 (e)1.âEach year, before calculating the value of Advanced 246 Placement, International Baccalaureate, and Advanced 247 International Certificate of Education supplements under this 248 paragraph, the department shall do all of the following: 249 a.âDesignate the following courses as rigorous courses that 250 are not rigorous STEM courses: 251 (I)âAdvanced Placement: English Language and Composition, 252 English Literature and Composition, Comparative Government and 253 Politics, United States Government and Politics, European 254 History, United States History, World History, Macroeconomics, 255 Microeconomics, Chinese Language and Culture, French Language 256 and Culture, German Language and Culture, Italian Language and 257 Culture, Japanese Language and Culture, Spanish Language and 258 Culture, Spanish Literature and Culture, Latin, and Psychology. 259 (II)âInternational Baccalaureate: History, Language A 260 Literature, Language A Language and Literature, Language B, 261 Classical Languages, Economics, Global Politics, Philosophy, and 262 Psychology. 263 (III)âAdvanced International Certificate of Education: 264 International History, European History, United States History 265 to 1877, United States History Since 1877, English Literature, 266 English Language, Chinese Language and Literature, Spanish 267 Language and Literature, French Language and Literature, German 268 Language and Literature, Portuguese, Classical Studies, 269 Economics, and Psychology. 270 b.âDesignate the following courses as rigorous courses that 271 are also rigorous STEM courses: 272 (I)âAdvanced Placement: Calculus AB, Calculus BC, Computer 273 Science A, Statistics, Biology, Chemistry, or Physics 1, Physics 274 2, Physics C: Electricity and Magnetism, and Physics C: 275 Mechanics. 276 (II)âInternational Baccalaureate: Biology, Computer 277 Science, Chemistry, Physics, and Mathematics: Analysis and 278 Approaches. 279 (III)âAdvanced International Certificate of Education: 280 Biology, Chemistry, Computer Science, Further Mathematics, 281 Mathematics, and Physics. 282 c.âDetermine and publish the criteria for Advanced 283 Placement, International Baccalaureate, or Advanced 284 International Certificate of Education courses that are not 285 included under this subparagraph to qualify as rigorous courses. 286 d.âDesignate qualifying courses as rigorous courses; and 287 remove the rigorous course designation if a course is not listed 288 under this subparagraph and no longer qualifies under the 289 departmentâs criteria. The departmentâs criteria for a course to 290 qualify as a rigorous course must include, but are not limited 291 to: 292 (I)âThe content of the course is equivalent to the content 293 of at least one course at every state university. 294 (II)âThe equivalent course at each state university must 295 count toward the required courses for at least one bachelorâs 296 degree at that state university and may not count only for the 297 general education, writing requirement, or minimum credits for 298 that bachelorâs degree. 299 2.âA value of 0.15 is assigned to a student who receives an 300 Advanced Placement Capstone diploma. A value of 0.30 is assigned 301 to a student who receives an International Baccalaureate diploma 302 or an Advanced International Certificate of Education diploma 303 with distinction, or value of 0.15 is assigned to a student who 304 receives an Advanced International Certificate of Education 305 diploma without distinction. 306 3.âA value must be assigned under this subparagraph for 307 each passing score a student receives in a course under this 308 subparagraph. If the student passes the relevant exam for the 309 course, a value of 0.16 is assigned to a student who is enrolled 310 in an Advanced Placement rigorous course; a value of 0.24 is 311 assigned to a student who is enrolled in a Higher Level 312 International Baccalaureate rigorous course or an Advanced 313 International Certificate of Education Advanced Level (A Level) 314 rigorous course; and a value of 0.12 is assigned to a student 315 who is enrolled in a Standard Level International Baccalaureate 316 course or an Advanced International Certificate of Education 317 Advanced Subsidiary Level (AS Level) rigorous course. Each value 318 assigned to a student for passing a relevant exam must be 319 multiplied by: 320 a.âTwo if the student receives a high score on the relevant 321 exam. 322 b.âTwo if the relevant exam is for a rigorous STEM course. 323 c.âIf both factors apply, the value must be multiplied by 324 both factors. 325 4.âAfter applying the relevant multiplier under paragraph 326 (c), 100 percent of the value of each supplement generated by a 327 student under this paragraph must be disbursed by each school 328 district and each SFO as funds to the Advanced Placement, 329 International Baccalaureate, or Advanced International 330 Certificate of Education program at the school in which the 331 student is enrolled. The schoolâs Advanced Placement, 332 International Baccalaureate, or Advanced International 333 Certificate of Education program shall use the funds disbursed 334 under this paragraph as follows: 335 a.âAfter applying the relevant multiplier under paragraph 336 (c), at least 50 percent of the value calculated under this 337 subparagraph for each supplement generated by a student for the 338 score that the student receives on the relevant exam for an 339 Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, or Advanced 340 International Certificate of Education course must be awarded as 341 a bonus to the teacher of that student in that course. If the 342 student had multiple teachers for the course, the bonus must be 343 divided equally among them. 344 b.âThe remaining balance of funds may be used only for 345 authorized expenses that are required for Advanced Placement, 346 International Baccalaureate, or Advanced International 347 Certificate of Education courses and diplomas, which may include 348 non-rigorous Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, 349 Advanced International Certificate of Education, Advanced 350 International Certificate of Education, or pre-Advanced 351 International Certificate of Education courses. These authorized 352 expenses may include only fees for relevant exams and diplomas, 353 costs for graphing calculators, costs for laboratory equipment 354 and laboratory supplies, and costs for teachers to participate 355 in professional development or training programs that are 356 provided or recognized by the College Board, the International 357 Baccalaureate Office, or Cambridge International Education; 358 however, the funds may not be used to supplant a school 359 districtâs base Florida Education Finance Program funds provided 360 pursuant to paragraph (1)(n). At least 50 percent of the total 361 value of authorized expenses on non-rigorous courses using the 362 remaining balance of funds must be for bonuses to the teachers 363 of those courses, proportionate to the total number of each 364 teacherâs students who passed the relevant exam for their 365 respective courses, with double the bonus for each high score 366 compared to each passing score. 367 5.âFor the purpose of this paragraph, the term âhigh scoreâ 368 means that a student receives a score of 5 on the relevant exam 369 for an Advanced Placement course, a score of 6 or 7 on the 370 relevant exam for an International Baccalaureate course, an AS 371 Level grade of âAâ on the relevant exam for an Advanced 372 International Certificate of Education AS Level course, or an A 373 Level grade of âAâ or higher on the relevant exam for an 374 Advanced International Certificate of Education A Level course. 375 (f)1.âA value of 0.025 is assigned to each student who 376 earns a CAPE Digital Tool certificate in the elementary school 377 grades. A value of 0.1 is assigned to each student who completes 378 a career-themed course pursuant to ss. 1003.491â1003.493 or who 379 obtains a CAPE industry certification from an organization or 380 provider on the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List as a 381 CAPE Basic Non-articulated industry certification. A value of 382 0.3 is assigned to a high school student who completes at least 383 three courses and an industry certification in a single career 384 and technical education program or program of study and who 385 exits with a standard high school diploma. Each industry 386 certification must be specifically identified in the CAPE 387 Industry Certification Funding List as a CAPE Pathways industry 388 certification. A value of 0.5 is assigned to a high school 389 student who completes CAPE Acceleration industry certifications 390 that articulate for 15 to 29 college credit hours. A value of 391 1.0 is assigned to a high school student who completes CAPE 392 Acceleration industry certifications that articulate for 30 or 393 more college credit hours. 394 2.âFor the purpose of this subparagraph, the term 395 âcompletesâ means the student earns a certificate of completion 396 recognized by the department for a preapprenticeship program or 397 for an apprenticeship program as defined in s. 446.021(5) and 398 (6), respectively. A value of 0.5 is assigned to a student who 399 completes a registered preapprenticeship program that does not 400 pay the student for on-the-job training. A value of 1.0 is 401 assigned to a student who completes a registered 402 preapprenticeship program that pays the student for on-the-job 403 training. If a student completes a registered preapprenticeship 404 program and, while enrolled in high school, enters an 405 apprenticeship agreement for a registered apprenticeship program 406 that credits the student for the same trade or occupation as 407 that preapprenticeship program, and subsequently graduates high 408 school, and if the start date of that registered apprenticeship 409 program is prior to graduation or within 6 months after 410 graduation, then: 411 a.âA value of 0.1 must be assigned to the student at the 412 time of graduation from high school. 413 b.âIf the student completes the registered apprenticeship 414 program, the department must report the certificate of 415 completion to the Florida Education and Training Placement 416 Information Program (FETPIP) pursuant to s. 1008.39, and an 417 additional value of 1.0 must be added to the advanced education 418 supplements that are assigned during the year the student 419 completes the program to the school district of the public 420 school from which the student graduated or to the SFO that 421 awarded a scholarship to the student in the year of graduation, 422 and the school district or the SFO must disburse 100 percent of 423 the value of that supplement as funds to that school pursuant to 424 subparagraph 4. 425 c.âIf the agreement undergoes cancellation as defined under 426 s. 446.021(10), the department must report the cancellation to 427 the FETPIP pursuant to s. 1008.39. 428 3.âFor a student to generate a supplement for completing a 429 registered preapprenticeship program described under 430 subparagraph 2.: 431 a.âThe program must be coordinated with the private school 432 or with the public school and school district in which the 433 student is enrolled, including the advertisement of the program 434 to students enrolled in the school and regular communication 435 between the program and the school regarding the studentâs 436 progress in the program and all of the studentâs current 437 semester grades. 438 b.âThe program must temporarily pause the studentâs 439 participation in the program if the studentâs prior semester GPA 440 is below 2.0 on a 4.0 scale. The program must temporarily pause 441 the studentâs participation in the program if the studentâs 442 current semester GPA is below 2.0 on a 4.0 scale. The student 443 must be reinstated in the program if the studentâs current 444 semester GPA is at least 2.0 on a 4.0 scale. 445 4.âEach school district and each SFO shall disburse 100 446 percent of the value of the supplements generated by a student 447 under this paragraph as funds to the school in which the student 448 is enrolled. The school shall use the funds disbursed under this 449 paragraph as follows: 450 a.âAfter applying the relevant multiplier under paragraph 451 (c), at least 20 percent of the value calculated under 452 subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. for each supplement generated 453 by a student must be awarded as a bonus to the teachers who 454 provided the instruction that led to the attainment of the 455 value, including to the teachers for the registered 456 preapprenticeship program that preceded a student generating a 457 supplement for a registered apprenticeship program under 458 subparagraph 2., proportionate to each teacherâs share of that 459 instruction. 460 b.âThe remaining balance of funds must be used for expenses 461 associated with the certifications, courses, and programs under 462 this paragraph; however, such funds may not be used to supplant 463 a school districtâs base Florida Education Finance Program funds 464 provided pursuant to paragraph (1)(n). 465 (g)1.âA student generates a supplement under this paragraph 466 for each math or science olympiad that the student qualifies 467 for. A value of 0.5 is assigned to a student who qualifies for 468 the American Invitational Mathematics Examination (AIME), the 469 United States Physics Olympiad (USAPhO) Exam, the United States 470 of America Biolympiad (USABO) Semifinal Exam, the United States 471 of America Computing Olympiad (USACO) Gold Division, the United 472 States National Chemistry Olympiad (USNCO) National Exam, or the 473 United States of America Astronomy and Astrophysics Organization 474 (USAAAO) National Astronomy Competition. A value of 2.0 is 475 assigned to a student who qualifies for the United States of 476 America Mathematical Olympiad (USAMO) or the United States of 477 America Junior Mathematical Olympiad (USAJMO), the USAPhO Silver 478 Medal or Gold Medal, the USABO Semifinal Exam Recognition of 479 Academic Excellence, the USACO Platinum Division, the USNCO 480 Olympiad High Honors, or the USAAAO National Astronomy 481 Competition Gold Medal. A value of 5.0 is assigned to a student 482 who qualifies for the Mathematical Olympiad Program (MOP), the 483 U.S. Physics Team Program, the USABO National Finals, the USACO 484 Camp, the Chemistry Olympiad Study Camp, or the USA Team for the 485 International Olympiad on Astronomy and Astrophysics. 486 2.âA student generates a supplement under this paragraph 487 for each math or science olympiad that the studentâs team wins. 488 A studentâs team is considered to have won a math or science 489 olympiad if the studentâs results at the math or science 490 olympiad are included in the calculation for the place that the 491 team wins at the math or science olympiad. Each school may 492 generate only one supplement for the same math or science 493 olympiad, and the supplement is generated by the student whose 494 team wins the best place at that math or science olympiad. A 495 value of 0.5 is assigned to a student whose team wins between 496 1st and 5th place inclusive at the Mu Alpha Theta (MAO) Florida 497 State Convention, qualifies for the Science Olympiad (SciOly) 498 Division B or Division C Florida State Tournament, qualifies for 499 the FIRST Robotics Competition (FRC), FIRST Tech Challenge 500 (FTC), or FIRST Lego League Challenge (FLL) Florida State 501 Championship, or qualifies for the National Science Bowl (NSB) 502 Middle or High School National Finals. A value of 2.0 is 503 assigned to a student whose team wins between 2nd and 4th place 504 inclusive at the MAO National Convention, qualifies for the 505 SciOly Division B or Division C National Tournament, qualifies 506 for the FRC, FTC, or FLL National or World Championship, or wins 507 between 5th and 12th place at the NSB Middle or High School 508 National Finals. A value of 5.0 is assigned to a student whose 509 teams wins 1st place at the MAO National Convention, wins 510 between 1st and 10th place inclusive at the SciOly Division B or 511 Division C National Tournament, wins either an award or has 512 students win the deanâs list at the FRC, FTC, or FLL National or 513 World Championship, or wins between 1st and 4th place inclusive 514 at the NSB Middle or High School National Finals. 515 3.âFor the purpose of this subsection, the terms âmath 516 olympiadâ means AIME, USAMO, USAJMO, MOP, or MAO and âscience 517 olympiadâ means any exam, competition, camp, award, or team that 518 is listed under subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. and is not a 519 math olympiad. 520 4.âAny governing organization of a math or science olympiad 521 under subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. must notify the 522 department if it changes the name of a math or science olympiad, 523 respectively, but maintains substantially similar selectivity, 524 and if so, subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. applies to the 525 renamed olympiad. 526 5.âFor a student to generate a supplement under this 527 paragraph for a math or science olympiad, the studentâs school 528 must designate a math or science team, respectively, or 529 designate one or more teams as the teams for some combination 530 thereof; and the school must designate between 1 and 10 teachers 531 at the school to serve as coaches for math olympiads, or between 532 1 and 10 teachers at the school to serve as the coaches for 533 science olympiads, respectively, or designate 1 or more teachers 534 as the coaches for some combination thereof; however, the school 535 may not designate more than 20 total coaches across the math and 536 science olympiads. 537 6.âEach school district and each SFO shall disburse 100 538 percent of the value of the supplements generated by a student 539 under this paragraph as funds to the school in which the student 540 is enrolled. The school shall use the funds disbursed under this 541 paragraph as follows: 542 a.âAfter applying the relevant multiplier under paragraph 543 (c), at least 50 percent of the value of each supplement 544 generated by a student under this paragraph must be awarded as a 545 bonus to the respective coach. If multiple coaches are 546 designated for the respective competition, the bonus must be 547 divided equally among them. 548 b.âThe math and science teams shall use the remaining 549 balance of funds for authorized expenses associated with any 550 regional, statewide, national, or international competitions 551 that the teams compete in during the school year or school 552 breaks, including math and science olympiads, and national 553 championships. These authorized expenses may include only fees 554 for students and teams to enter competitions or take competitive 555 exams, travel and lodging expenses for students and coaches, 556 meals for students and coaches, supplies and equipment that the 557 teams use for competitions, T-shirts and other apparel for 558 students and coaches which identify the school or team, and any 559 costs incurred from hosting competitions. The teams may deposit 560 some or all of the funds disbursed under this subparagraph into 561 an account to use for any authorized expenses during future 562 school years and future school breaks. 563 (h)âBonuses awarded under this subsection are in addition 564 to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher received or is 565 scheduled to receive. A teacher who violates the security of any 566 assessment instrument that may result in a bonus being awarded 567 to the teacher under this subsection, including any dual 568 enrollment, Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, or 569 Advanced International Certificate of Education exam, any CAPE 570 industry certification, or math or science olympiad, may not be 571 awarded any bonus under this subsection for at least 3 years 572 after the first violation and permanently after any further 573 violations, pursuant to an investigation under s. 1008.24. 574 (i)âA student enrolled in a public school, or enrolled in a 575 private school and participating in a scholarship program under 576 s. 1002.394 or s. 1002.395, is exempt from the payment of any 577 fees for participating in any dual enrollment, Advanced 578 Placement, International Baccalaureate, or Advanced 579 International Certificate of Education program, any CAPE 580 industry certifications, career and technical education, or math 581 or science olympiad, including fees for exams, regardless of 582 whether the student passes the exams The academic acceleration 583 options supplement is created to assist school districts in 584 providing academic acceleration options, career-themed courses, 585 and courses that lead to digital tool certificates and industry 586 certifications for prekindergarten through grade 12 students and 587 shall be allocated annually in the General Appropriations Act. 588 (a)1.âEach school district shall report its total number of 589 academic acceleration values in a format prescribed by the 590 Department of Education. 591 2.âThe supplement shall be allocated based on each school 592 districtâs proportionate share of the stateâs total academic 593 acceleration values. 594 3.âFor purposes of the amount of the supplement 595 appropriated in the fiscal year 2025-2026 General Appropriations 596 Act, an adjustment is included which will not be a part of the 597 supplement when the Florida Education Finance Program is 598 recalculated pursuant to paragraph (1)(a). 599 (b)1.âA value of 0.16 is assigned to a student enrolled in 600 an early college program pursuant to s. 1007.273 who completes a 601 general education core course through the dual enrollment 602 program with a grade of âAâ or better; however, the value is 603 0.08 if the student is not enrolled in an early college program. 604 A value of 0.08 shall be assigned to a student who completed a 605 career course through the dual enrollment program with a grade 606 of âAâ in a pathway that leads to an industry certification that 607 is included on the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List. A 608 value of 0.3 shall be assigned to a student who receives an 609 associate degree through the dual enrollment program with a 3.0 610 grade point average or better. 611 2.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, general education 612 core courses are those that are identified in rule by the State 613 Board of Education and in regulation by the Board of Governors 614 pursuant to s. 1007.25(3). 615 3.âEach school district shall use the funds received from 616 the supplement for expenses associated with the applicable 617 courses; however, such funds may not be used by the school 618 district to supplant the districtâs base Florida Education 619 Finance Program funds provided pursuant to paragraph (1)(n). 620 (c)1.âA value of 0.16 is assigned to a student enrolled in 621 an Advanced Placement course who receives a score of 3 or higher 622 on the College Board Advanced Placement examination. A value of 623 0.3 is assigned to a student who receives an Advanced Placement 624 Capstone diploma. 625 2.âFrom the funds received from the supplement, each school 626 district shall award a $50 bonus to each Advanced Placement 627 teacher for each student who achieves a score of 3 or higher on 628 the College Board Advanced Placement examination. Each school 629 district shall award an additional bonus of $500 to each 630 Advanced Placement teacher in a school designated with a grade 631 of âDâ or âFâ who has at least one student scoring 3 or higher 632 on the College Board Advanced Placement examination. The school 633 district shall use the remaining balance of funds for expenses 634 associated with the Advanced Placement courses to include the 635 cost for the Advanced Placement examination fee and for teacher 636 professional learning; however, such funds may not be used to 637 supplant the school districtâs base Florida Education Finance 638 Program funds provided pursuant to paragraph (1)(n). 639 (d)1.âA value of 0.16 is assigned to a student enrolled in 640 a full-credit Advanced International Certificate of Education 641 course and who receives a score of âEâ or higher on the Advanced 642 International Certificate of Education examination. A value of 643 0.08 is assigned for a student enrolled in a half-credit 644 Advanced International Certificate of Education course and who 645 receives a score of âEâ or higher on the Advanced International 646 Certificate of Education examination. A value of 0.3 is assigned 647 to a student who receives an Advanced International Certificate 648 of Education diploma. 649 2.a.âFrom the funds received from the supplement, each 650 school district shall award a $50 bonus to each Advanced 651 International Certificate of Education teacher for each student 652 who receives a score of âEâ or higher on the Advanced 653 International Certificate of Education examination or a $25 654 bonus to a pre-Advanced International Certificate of Education 655 teacher if the student received a score of âEâ or higher on the 656 pre-Advanced International Certificate of Education examination. 657 Each school district shall award an additional bonus in the 658 amount of $500 to each teacher of an Advanced International 659 Certificate of Education course in a school designated with a 660 grade of âDâ or âFâ which has at least one student scoring an 661 âEâ or higher on the applicable examination. Each school 662 district shall award an additional bonus in the amount of $250 663 to each teacher of a pre-Advanced International Certificate of 664 Education course in a school designated with a grade of âDâ or 665 âFâ which has at least one student scoring an âEâ or higher on 666 the applicable examination. A teacher receiving a $500 bonus is 667 not eligible for the $250 bonus. 668 b.âThe school district shall use the remaining funds for 669 expenses associated with the applicable courses to include any 670 student program and examination fees; however, such funds may 671 not be used to supplant the districtâs base Florida Education 672 Finance Program funds provided pursuant to paragraph (1)(n). 673 (e)1.âA value of 0.16 is assigned to a student in an 674 International Baccalaureate course who receives a score of 4 or 675 higher on a subject examination or a score of âCâ or higher on 676 the Theory of Knowledge course. A value of 0.3 is assigned to a 677 student who receives an International Baccalaureate diploma. 678 2.âFrom the funds received from the supplement, each school 679 district shall award a $50 bonus to each International 680 Baccalaureate teacher for each student who achieves a score of 4 681 or higher on an International Baccalaureate examination or a âCâ 682 or higher in the Theory of Knowledge course. Each school 683 district shall award an additional bonus of $500 if the 684 International Baccalaureate teacher is in a school designated 685 with a grade of âDâ or âFâ and has at least one student scoring 686 4 or higher on the International Baccalaureate examination or a 687 âCâ or higher in the Theory of Knowledge course. The school 688 district shall use the remaining funds for expenses associated 689 with the applicable courses to include the cost of the 690 assessment fee for the International Baccalaureate diploma; 691 however, such funds may not be used to supplant the districtâs 692 base Florida Education Finance Program funds provided pursuant 693 to paragraph (1)(n). 694 (f)1.âA value of 0.025 is assigned to each student who 695 earns a CAPE Digital Tool certificate in elementary and middle 696 school grades. Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, this 697 value shall apply only to students in the elementary school 698 grades. A value of 0.1 is assigned to each student who completes 699 a career-themed course pursuant to ss. 1003.491-1003.493, or a 700 course with an embedded CAPE industry certification and is 701 issued an approved industry certification specifically 702 identified in the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List as a 703 CAPE Basic Non-articulated industry certification. A value of 704 0.2 is assigned to each student who completes a career-themed 705 course pursuant to ss. 1003.491-1003.493, or a course with an 706 embedded CAPE industry certification and is issued an approved 707 industry certification specifically identified in the CAPE 708 Industry Certification Funding List as a CAPE Basic Articulated 709 industry certification. A value of 0.3 is assigned to a high 710 school student who completes at least three courses and an 711 industry certification in a single career and technical 712 education program or program of study and who exits with a 713 standard high school diploma. Each industry certification must 714 be specifically identified in the CAPE Industry Certification 715 Funding List as a CAPE Pathways industry certification. A value 716 of 0.5 is assigned to a high school student who completes CAPE 717 Acceleration industry certifications that articulate for 15 to 718 29 college credit hours. A value of 1.0 is assigned to a high 719 school student who completes CAPE Acceleration industry 720 certifications that articulate for 30 or more college credit 721 hours. 722 2.âFrom the funds received from the supplement, each school 723 district shall award the following bonuses to teachers who 724 provided instruction that led to the attainment of the assigned 725 student value: 726 a.âA bonus of $25 for each student with an assigned value 727 of 0.1. 728 b.âA bonus of $50 for each student with an assigned value 729 of 0.2. 730 c.âA bonus of $75 for each student with an assigned value 731 of 0.3. 732 d.âA bonus of $100 for each student with an assigned value 733 of 0.5 or 1.0. 734 3.âThe school district shall use the remaining funds for 735 expenses associated with the applicable courses; however, such 736 funds may not be used to supplant the districtâs base Florida 737 Education Finance Program funds provided pursuant to paragraph 738 (1)(n). 739 (g)âBonuses awarded under this subsection shall be in 740 addition to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher received 741 or is scheduled to receive. A bonus may not be awarded to a 742 teacher who fails to maintain the security of any CAPE industry 743 certification examination or who otherwise violates the security 744 or administration protocol of any assessment instrument that may 745 result in a bonus being awarded to the teacher under this 746 subsection. 747 (h)1.âA value of 0.25 is assigned to each student who 748 graduates one semester in advance of the studentâs cohort and a 749 value of 0.5 is assigned to each student who graduates 1 year or 750 more in advance of the studentâs cohort pursuant to s. 751 1003.4281. If the student was enrolled in the district as a 752 full-time high school student for at least 2 years, the district 753 must report the student in the subsequent fiscal year. If the 754 student was enrolled in the district for less than 2 years, the 755 district of enrollment must report the students and must 756 transfer a proportionate share of the funds earned for early 757 graduation to the district in which the student was previously 758 enrolled. 759 2.âEach school district shall use the funds received from 760 the supplement for expenses associated with providing students 761 with early graduation options established pursuant to s. 762 1003.4281; however, such funds may not be used by the school 763 district to supplant the districtâs base Florida Education 764 Finance Program funds provided pursuant to paragraph (1)(n). 765 (i)âBeginning September 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, 766 each school district must report its prior year total 767 expenditures of its academic acceleration supplement funds to 768 the Legislature in a format prescribed by the Department of 769 Education. 770 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.